src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-14saabas_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - saabas: # Noun (14) saabas 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     saabas+N+Sg+Nom: saabas
     saabas+N+Sg+Gen: saapa
     saabas+N+Sg+Par: saabast
     saabas+N+Sg+Ill: saapahe
     saabas+N+Sg+Ine: saapan
     saabas+N+Sg+Ela: saapast
     saabas+N+Sg+All: saapalõ
     saabas+N+Sg+Ade: saapal
     saabas+N+Sg+Abl: saapalt
     saabas+N+Sg+Tra: saapas
     saabas+N+Sg+Ter: saapaniq
     saabas+N+Sg+Abe: saapaldaq
     saabas+N+Sg+Com: saapagaq
     saabas+N+Pl+Nom: saapaq
     saabas+N+Pl+Gen: saapidõ
     saabas+N+Pl+Par: saapit
     saabas+N+Pl+Ill: saapihe
     saabas+N+Pl+Ine: saapin
     saabas+N+Pl+Ela: saapist
     saabas+N+Pl+All: saapilõ
     saabas+N+Pl+Ade: saapil
     saabas+N+Pl+Abl: saapilt
     saabas+N+Pl+Tra: saapis
     saabas+N+Pl+Ter: saapiniq
     saabas+N+Pl+Abe: saapildaq
     saabas+N+Pl+Com: saapidõgaq
